Hawaii statutes.
§490:7-302 Through bills of lading and
similar documents of title. (a) The issuer of a through bill of lading,
or other document of title embodying an undertaking to be performed in part by
a person acting as its agent or by a performing carrier, is liable to any
person entitled to recover on the bill or other document for any breach by the
other person or the performing carrier of its obligation under the bill or
other document. However, to the extent that the bill or other document covers
an undertaking to be performed overseas or in territory not contiguous to the
continental United States or an undertaking including matters other than
transportation, this liability for breach by the other person or the performing
carrier may be varied by agreement of the parties.

(b) If goods covered by a through bill of
lading or other document of title embodying an undertaking to be performed in
part by a person other than the issuer are received by that person, the person
is subject, with respect to its own performance while the goods are in its
possession, to the obligation of the issuer. The person's obligation is
discharged by delivery of the goods to another person pursuant to the bill or
other document and does not include liability for breach by any other person or
by the issuer.

(c) The issuer of a through bill of lading or
other document of title described in subsection (a) is entitled to recover from
the performing carrier, or other person in possession of the goods when the
breach of the obligation under the bill or other document occurred:

(1) The amount it may be required to pay to any
person entitled to recover on the bill or other document for the breach, as may
be evidenced by any receipt, judgment, or transcript of judgment; and

(2) The amount of any expense reasonably incurred by
the issuer in defending any action commenced by any person entitled to recover
on the bill or other document for the breach. [L 2004, c 163, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next